Florida, session 2026, SB1486.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 37 38 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (7) of section 39 20.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 40 20.04âStructure of executive branch.âThe executive branch 41 of state government is structured as follows: 42 (7) 43 (b)âWithin the limitations of this subsection, the head of 44 the department may recommend the establishment of additional 45 divisions, offices, bureaus, sections, and subsections of the 46 department to promote efficient and effective operation of the 47 department. However, such additional divisions, or offices, 48 bureaus, sections, and subsections in the Department of Children 49 and Families, the Department of Corrections, the Department of 50 Commerce, and the Department of Transportation, may be 51 established only by specific statutory enactment. New bureaus, 52 sections, and subsections of departments may be initiated by a 53 department and established as recommended by the Department of 54 Management Services and approved by the Executive Office of the 55 Governor, or may be established by specific statutory enactment. 56 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 20.165, Florida 57 Statutes, is amended to read: 58 20.165âDepartment of Business and Professional Regulation. 59 There is created a Department of Business and Professional 60 Regulation. 61 (3)âThe secretary shall appoint a director for each 62 division established within this section. Each division director 63 shall directly administer the division and shall be responsible 64 to the secretary. The secretary may appoint deputy and assistant 65 secretaries, subject to review and approval by the Legislature, 66 as necessary to aid the secretary in fulfilling the secretaryâs 67 statutory obligations. 68 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 69 20.23, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 70 20.23âDepartment of Transportation.âThere is created a 71 Department of Transportation which shall be a decentralized 72 agency. 73 (4) 74 (b)âThe secretary may appoint positions at the level of 75 deputy assistant secretary or director, subject to review and 76 approval by the Legislature, which the secretary deems necessary 77 to accomplish the mission and goals of the department, 78 including, but not limited to, the areas of program 79 responsibility provided in this paragraph, each of whom shall be 80 appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the secretary. The 81 secretary may combine, separate, or delete offices, subject to 82 review and approval by the Legislature, as needed in 83 consultation with the Executive Office of the Governor. The 84 departmentâs areas of program responsibility include, but are 85 not limited to, all of the following: 86 1.âAdministration. 87 2.âPlanning. 88 3.âSupply chain and modal development. 89 4.âDesign. 90 5.âHighway operations. 91 6.âRight-of-way. 92 7.âToll operations. 93 8.âTransportation technology. 94 9.âInformation technology. 95 10.âMotor carrier weight inspection. 96 11.âWork program and budget. 97 12.âComptroller. 98 13.âConstruction. 99 14.âStatewide corridors. 100 15.âMaintenance. 101 16.âForecasting and performance. 102 17.âEmergency management. 103 18.âSafety. 104 19.âMaterials. 105 20.âInfrastructure and innovation. 106 21.âPermitting. 107 22.âTraffic operations. 108 23.âOperational technology. 109 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 110 20.315, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 111 20.315âDepartment of Corrections.âThere is created a 112 Department of Corrections. 113 (3)âSECRETARY OF CORRECTIONS.âThe head of the Department of 114 Corrections is the Secretary of Corrections. The secretary is 115 appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the 116 Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The 117 secretary is responsible for planning, coordinating, and 118 managing the corrections system of the state. The secretary 119 shall ensure that the programs and services of the department 120 are administered in accordance with state and federal laws, 121 rules, and regulations, with established program standards, and 122 consistent with legislative intent. The secretary shall identify 123 the need for and recommend funding for the secure and efficient 124 operation of the state correctional system. 125 (c)âThe secretary may appoint assistant secretaries, 126 directors, or other such persons that he or she deems are 127 necessary, subject to review and approval by the Legislature, to 128 accomplish the mission and goals of the department, including, 129 but not limited to, the following areas of program 130 responsibility: 131 1.âSecurity and institutional operations, which shall 132 provide inmate work programs, offender programs, security 133 administration, emergency operations response, and operational 134 oversight of the regions. 135 2.âHealth services, which shall be headed by a physician 136 licensed under chapter 458 or an osteopathic physician licensed 137 under chapter 459, or a professionally trained health care 138 administrator with progressively responsible experience in 139 health care administration. This individual shall be responsible 140 for the delivery of health services to offenders within the 141 system and shall have direct professional authority over such 142 services. 143 3.âCommunity corrections, which shall provide for 144 coordination of community alternatives to incarceration and 145 operational oversight of community corrections regions. 146 4.âAdministrative services, which shall provide budget and 147 accounting services within the department, including the 148 construction and maintenance of correctional institutions, human 149 resource management, research, planning and evaluation, and 150 technology. 151 5.âProgram, transition, and postrelease services, which 152 shall provide for the direct management and supervision of all 153 departmental programs, including the coordination and delivery 154 of education and job training to the offenders in the custody of 155 the department. In addition, this program shall provide for the 156 direct management and supervision of all programs that furnish 157 transition assistance to inmates who are or have recently been 158 in the custody of the department, including the coordination, 159 facilitation, and contract management of prerelease and 160 postrelease transition services provided by governmental and 161 private providers, including faith-based service groups. 162 Section 5.âSubsection (2) of section 20.316, Florida 163 Statutes, is amended to read: 164 20.316âDepartment of Juvenile Justice.âThere is created a 165 Department of Juvenile Justice. 166 (2)âDEPARTMENT PROGRAMS.âThe following programs are 167 established within the Department of Juvenile Justice: 168 (a)âAccountability and Program Support. 169 (b)âAdministration. 170 (c)âIntake and Detention. 171 (d)âPrevention Services. 172 (e)âProbation and Community Corrections. 173 (f)âResidential and Correctional Facilities. 174 175 The secretary may establish assistant secretary positions and a 176 chief of staff position, subject to review and approval by the 177 Legislature, as necessary to administer the requirements of this 178 section. 179 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 20.41, Florida 180 Statutes, is amended to read: 181 20.41âDepartment of Elderly Affairs.âThere is created a 182 Department of Elderly Affairs. 183 (1)âThe head of the department is the Secretary of Elderly 184 Affairs. The secretary must be appointed by the Governor, 185 subject to confirmation by the Senate. The secretary serves at 186 the pleasure of the Governor. The secretary shall administer the 187 affairs of the department and may employ assistants, 188 professional staff, and other employees, subject to review and 189 approval by the Legislature, as necessary to discharge the 190 powers and duties of the department. 191 Section 7.âSubsection (9) of section 20.43, Florida 192 Statutes, is amended to read: 193 20.43âDepartment of Health.âThere is created a Department 194 of Health. 195 (9)âThere is established within the Department of Health 196 the Office of Minority Health and Health Equity, which shall be 197 headed by a Senior Health Equity Officer. The Senior Health 198 Equity Officer shall administer the Closing the Gap grant 199 program established under ss. 381.7351-381.7356 in a manner that 200 maximizes the impact of the grants in achieving health equity. 201 The Senior Health Equity Officer shall evaluate the awarded 202 grants to assess the effectiveness and efficiency of the use of 203 funds and to determine best practices. The Senior Health Equity 204 Officer shall disseminate information on best practices to 205 stakeholders and shall ensure that the assessments inform future 206 grant award decisions. 207 Section 8.âSubsection (2) of section 20.60, Florida 208 Statutes, is amended to read: 209 20.60âDepartment of Commerce; creation; powers and duties.â 210 (2)âThe head of the department is the Secretary of 211 Commerce, who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to 212 confirmation by the Senate. The secretary shall serve at the 213 pleasure of and report to the Governor and shall serve as the 214 Governorâs chief negotiator for business recruitment and 215 expansion and economic development. The secretary may appoint 216 deputy and assistant secretaries, subject to review and approval 217 by the Legislature, as necessary to aid the secretary in 218 fulfilling his or her statutory obligations. 219 Section 9.âThe Legislature shall, by the adjournment of the 220 2027 Regular Session, review the purposes and functions of every 221 department division, office, bureau, section, and subsection and 222 dissolve any such division, office, bureau, section, and 223 subsection as it deems necessary. 224 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 225 282.0051, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 226 282.0051âDepartment of Management Services; Florida Digital 227 Service; powers, duties, and functions.â 228 (2)(a)âThe Secretary of Management Services shall designate 229 a state chief information officer, who shall administer the 230 Florida Digital Service. The state chief information officer, 231 prior to appointment, must have at least 5 years of experience 232 in the development of information system strategic planning and 233 development or information technology policy, and, preferably, 234 have leadership-level experience in the design, development, and 235 deployment of interoperable software and data solutions. The 236 state chief information officer shall have all decisionmaking 237 authority with respect to information technology on behalf of 238 all departments and all department divisions, offices, bureaus, 239 sections, and subsections. 240 Section 11.âSection 381.735, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 241 Section 12.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 381.814, 242 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 243 381.814âSickle Cell Disease Research and Treatment Grant 244 Program.âThe Sickle Cell Disease Research and Treatment Grant 245 Program is created within the Department of Health. 246 (3)âFunds appropriated to the program shall be awarded by 247 the Department of Health Office of Minority Health and Health 248 Equity, within the department, to community-based sickle cell 249 disease medical treatment and research centers operating in this 250 state. 251 (4)âThe Department of Health Office of Minority Health and 252 Health Equity shall award grants under the program to community 253 based sickle cell disease medical treatment and research centers 254 to fund projects specific to sickle cell disease in the 255 following project areas: 256 (a)âSickle cell disease workforce development and 257 education.âSuch projects shall include, but need not be limited 258 to, facility-based education programs, continuing education 259 curriculum development, and outreach and education activities 260 with the local health care practitioner community. Workforce 261 development and education projects must be based on current 262 evidence-based clinical practice guidelines for sickle cell 263 disease. 264 (b)âSickle Cell Disease Treatment Centers of Excellence. 265 Such projects shall include, but need not be limited to, 266 operational support for existing centers of excellence, facility 267 enhancement of existing centers of excellence, and the 268 establishment of new centers of excellence. 269 Section 13.âSubsection (6) of section 383.2163, Florida 270 Statutes, is amended to read: 271 383.2163âTelehealth Minority Maternity Care Program.âThe 272 department shall establish a statewide Telehealth Minority 273 Maternity Care Program that uses telehealth to expand the 274 capacity for positive maternal health outcomes in racial and 275 ethnic minority populations. The department may enlist county 276 health departments to assist with program implementation. 277 (6)âFUNDING.âThe departmentâs Division of Community Health 278 Promotion and Office of Minority Health and Health Equity shall 279 work in partnership to apply for federal funds that are 280 available to assist the department in accomplishing the 281 programâs purpose and successfully implementing the program. 282 Section 14.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 283 409.91235, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 284 409.91235âAgency review and report on medications, 285 treatments, and services for sickle cell disease.â 286 (1)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration, in 287 consultation with the Florida Medical Schools Quality Network 288 and a dedicated sickle cell disease medical treatment and 289 research center that maintains a sickle cell patient database 290 and tracks sickle cell disease outcome measures, shall, every 2 291 years: 292 (b)1.âDevelop a written report that details the review 293 findings. 294 2.âBeginning November 1, 2024, and by November 1 of every 295 other year thereafter, post the report on the agencyâs website. 296 3.âSubmit a copy of the report to the Governor, the 297 President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 298 Representatives, the Department of Health Healthâs Office of 299 Minority Health and Health Equity, and the Rare Disease Advisory 300 Council. 301 Section 15.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.